Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.56.240

Forfeiture and disposal of device used to commit violation.

Upon conviction of theft or unlawful sale of cable television services and upon motion and hearing, the court shall order the forfeiture of any decoder, descrambler, or other device used in committing the violation of RCW 9A.56.220 or 9A.56.230 as contraband and dispose of it at the court's discretion.

[ 1985 c 430 s 3.]

NOTES:

Severability—1985 c 430: See note following RCW 9A.56.220.